Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-204.01
Perinatal mental health disorder, defined.

Perinatal mental health disorder means a mental health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the postpartum period, including depression, anxiety, or postpartum psychosis.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 3.